ja: ワックス硬度: エクストラハード; ハード; ミディアム; ミディアムハード; ミディアムソフト; ソフト; その他
sv: Vaxhårdhet: Extra hård; Hård; Medium; Medelhård; Medelmjuk; Mjuk; Övrigt
ko: 왁스 경도: 엑스트라 하드; 하드; 미디엄; 미디엄 하드; 미디엄 소프트; 소프트; 기타
hu: Viasz keménysége: Extra kemény; Kemény; Közepes; Közepesen kemény; Közepesen puha; Puha; Egyéb
nl: Was hardheid: Extra hard; Hard; Medium; Medium hard; Medium zacht; Zacht; Overige
hr-HR: Tvrdoća voska: Vrlo tvrdo; Tvrdo; Srednje; Srednje tvrdo; Srednje mekano; Mekano; Ostalo
bg-BG: Твърдост на ваксата: Изключително твърд; Твърд; Среднотвърд; Средно твърд; Средно мек; Мек; Други
en: Wax hardness: Extra hard; Hard; Medium; Medium hard; Medium soft; Soft; Other
ro-RO: Duritatea cerii: Foarte dură; Dură; Medie; Mediu dură; Mediu moale; Moale; Altele
pt-BR: Cera dureza: Extradura; Dura; Média; Média-dura; Média-macia; Macia; Outros
es: Dureza de la cera: Extradura; Dura; Media; Semidura; Semiblanda; Blanda; Otro
sk-SK: Tvrdosť vosku: Extra tvrdý; Tvrdý; Stredný; Stredne tvrdý; Stredne mäkký; Mäkký; Iné
nb: Voksens hardhet: Ekstra hard; Hard; Medium; Medium hard; Medium myk; Myk; Annet
fr: Dureté du fart: Extra dure; Dure; Moyenne; Moyennement dure; Moyennement molle; Molle; Autre
el: Σκληρότητα κεριού: Πολύ σκληρό; Σκληρό; Μεσαίο; Μεσαίο-σκληρό; Μεσαίο-μαλακό; Μαλακό; Άλλο
de: Wachshärte: Extrahart; Hart; Mittel; Mittelhart; Mittelweich; Weich; Sonstige
fi: Vahan kovuus: Erittäin kova; Kova; Keskikova; Keskikova; Puolipehmeä; Pehmeä; Muu
lt-LT: Vaško kietumas: Itin kietas; Kietas; Vidutinis; Vidutiniškai kietas; Vidutiniškai minkštas; Minkštas; Kita
ru: Твердость воска: Очень твердый; Твердый; Средний; Средне-твердый; Средне-мягкий; Мягкий; Другое
pt-PT: Dureza da cera: Extra duro; Duro; Médio; Médio duro; Médio macio; Macio; Outro
sl-SI: Trdota voska: Zelo trdo; Trdo; Srednje; Srednje trdo; Srednje mehko; Mehko; Drugo
vi: Độ cứng của sáp: Siêu cứng; Cứng; Trung bình; Cứng vừa; Mềm vừa; Mềm; Khác
tr: Balmumu sertliği: Ekstra sert; Sert; Orta; Orta sert; Orta yumuşak; Yumuşak; Diğer
zh-CN: 蜡硬度: 特硬; 硬; 中等; 中硬; 中软; 软; 其他
zh-TW: 蠟硬度: 特硬; 硬; 中; 中硬; 中軟; 軟; 其他
it: Durezza della cera: Extra dura; Dura; Media; Medio-dura; Medio-morbida; Morbida; Altro
th: ความแข็งของขี้ผึ้ง: แข็งเป็นพิเศษ; แข็ง; ปานกลาง; แข็งปานกลาง; นุ่มปานกลาง; นุ่ม; อื่นๆ
da: Vokshårdhed: Ekstra hård; Hård; Medium; Medium hård; Medium blød; Blød; Andet
cs: Tvrdost vosku: Extra tvrdý; Tvrdý; Střední; Středně tvrdý; Středně měkký; Měkký; Jiná
pl: Twardość wosku: Bardzo twardy; Twardy; Średni; Średnio twardy; Średnio miękki; Miękki; Inne